District of Columbia statutes.
10-1215

Transferred

Washington Convention Center Fund — Established; limitation on assets; deposits; expenditures; billings and collections; transfer of excess operating profits; Antideficiency Act applicable

Recodified as § 10-1215.

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 401, 41 DCR 5333